2009-sfcm/omorfi.twolc
Alphabet

A C D E F G H I J K  L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Å Ä Ö È
a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y š ž Š Ž
	z å ä ö ':0 
	á à â é è ê î ô û í ï ó ò ú ù	
	%4 %-:%- ’ %'   ‐ 
	a:e ä:e
	%~T:t %~P:p %~K:k
	%~K:’ %~K:v %~K:0 %~K:g %~K:j 
	%~T:l %~T:r %~T:n %~T:0 %~T:d 
	%~P:m %~P:0 %~P:v
	%~A:a %~A:ä %~O:o %~O:ö %~U:u %~U:y 
	%~V:0 %~V:a %~V:e %~V:i %~V:o %~V:u %~V:y %~V:ä %~V:ö
	%~N:l %~N:r %~N:s %~N:n

	%+62:0 %+63:0 %+64:0 %+65:0 %+73:0 n:0
	%+present:0 %+possessive:0 %+comparative:0
	%+AV%+:0 %+AV%-:0
	%^A:0 %^O:0 %^U:0 %^Ä:0 %^Ö:0 %^E:0 %^I:0 %^Y:0 %^TAKA:0 %^ETU:0 #:0
	%^Ä:0 %^Ö:0 ##:0 %^TAKA:0 %^YÖ:0 %^UO:0
	%+AVA:0 %+AVB:0 %+AVC:0 %+AVD:0 %+AVE:0 %+AVF:0 %+AVG:0 %+AVH:0 %+AVI:0 
	%+AVJ:0 %+AVK:0 %+AVL %+AVM:0 %+AVN:0 %+AVO:0 %+AVP:0 %+AVT:0
	%+AVX:0 %+AVY:0 
	%^IE:0 %^Ix:0 %+PLT:0  %  ;


Rule-variables

Vf Vg Vh V Vnf Va Vg Vgr Ns Vx Cs Cw Cm AÄ ;

Sets

Soinnutettu = A O U a o u Ä Ö Y ä ö y %^A %^O %^U %^Ä %^Ö %^Y %^ETU %^TAKA # ;
BackHarmony = A O U a o u %^A %^O %^U %^TAKA ;
FrontHarmony = Ä Ö Y ä ö y %^Ä %^Ö %^Y %^ETU ;
Vowels = a e i o u y å ä ö á à â é è ê î ô û í ï ó ò ú ù A E I O U Y Ä Ö È ;
BasicVowels = a e i o u y å ä ö ;
GhostVowels = %^A %^E %^I %^O %^U %^Y %^Ä %^Ö ;

FrontGhostVowels   = %^Y %^Ä %^Ö ;
FrontVowels        =   y   ä   ö ;

VowelHarmonyMP            = %~A   e   i %~O %~U ;
NonFrontGhostVowels       = %^A %^E %^I %^O %^U ;
NonFrontVowels            =   a   e   i   o   u ; 
NonFrontAccentAcuteVowels =   á   é   í   ó   ú ;
NonFrontAccentGraveVowels =   à   è   ï   ò   ù ;

WordChars = a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s š t u v w x y z ž å ä ö 
            A C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S Š T U V W X Y Z Ž Å Ä Ö 
            á à â é è ê î ô û È %4 ‐ %- ’ %' %  # ## ;

GradeMarks = %+AV%+ %+AV%- ;
Grades = %+AVA %+AVB %+AVC %+AVD %+AVE %+AVF %+AVG %+AVH %+AVI %+AVJ %+AVK %+AVL
		 %+AVM %+AVN %+AVO %+AVP %+AVT ;
Gradations = GradeMarks Grades # ## ;

NoVowelLengtheningClasses = %+62 %+63 %+64 %+65 %+73 ;

Definitions

Soinnuttamaton = ? - [ Soinnutettu:? | #: | ##: ] ;
ConsonantCluster = [ ? - [ Vowels | GhostVowels: | NoVowelLengtheningClasses: | VowelHarmonyMP: | #: | ##: ] ]* ;
BackRealizations = [ %~A:a | %~O:o | %~U:u ] ;

Rules

"Possessive n deletion"
n:0 <=> _ %+possessive: ;

"Geminate Gradation"
 %~P:0 <=>  _ [ \Gradations:0 ]* %+AVB: [ \Gradations:0 ]* %+AV%-: ;

"K:0 gradation"
%~K:0 <=> _ [ \Gradations:0 ]* [ %+AVD:0 | %+AVA:0 ] [ \Gradations:0 ]* %+AV%-: ;

"K:’ special cases"
%~K:’ <=> :Vx _ :Vx [ \Gradations:0 ]* %+AVD:0 [ \Gradations:0 ]* %+AV%-:0 ; 
	where Vx in BasicVowels ;

"T:0 gradation"
%~T:0 <=> _ [ \Gradations:0 ]* [ %+AVC:0 | %+AVT:0 ] [ \Gradations:0 ]* %+AV%-:0 ;

"Weakening gradation others"
Cs:Cw <=> _ [ \Gradations:0 ]* Cm: [ \Gradations:0 ]* %+AV%-: ;
	where Cs in (   %~K   %~K   %~K   %~P   %~P   %~T   %~T   %~T   %~T ) Cw in (     g     j     v     v     m     d     l     n     r ) Cm in ( %+AVG %+AVL %+AVM %+AVE %+AVH %+AVF %+AVI %+AVJ %+AVK ) matched ;

"Vowel Harmony"

!! $vowelharmony1$ = ({<~A>}:{a} ^-> ($backharmony$ $soinnuttamaton$* __) )
!! $vowelharmony2$ = ({<~A>}:{ä} ^-> ($frontharmony$ $soinnuttamaton$* __) )
!! $vowelharmony3$ = ({<~A>}:{ä} ^-> (<wb>$soinnuttamaton$* __) )
!! $vowelharmony4$ = ({<~O>}:{o} ^-> ($backharmony$ $soinnuttamaton$* __) )
!! $vowelharmony5$ = ({<~O>}:{ö} ^-> ($frontharmony$ $soinnuttamaton$* __) )
!! $vowelharmony6$ = ({<~O>}:{ö} ^-> (<wb>$soinnuttamaton$* __) )
!! $vowelharmony7$ = ({<~U>}:{u} ^-> ($backharmony$ $soinnuttamaton$* __) )
!! $vowelharmony8$ = ({<~U>}:{y} ^-> ($frontharmony$ $soinnuttamaton$* __) )
!! $vowelharmony9$ = ({<~U>}:{y} ^-> (<wb>$soinnuttamaton$* __) )

Vh:V <=> BackHarmony: Soinnuttamaton* _ ; where Vh in ( %~A %~O %~U )
                                               V  in ( a o u ) ;

"Vowel Lengthening ~V:0"

!! $vowellengthening0d$ = {<~V>}:{<>} ^-> ([<62><63><64><65>][^<wb>]*<pres>.*__)
!! $vowellengthening0e$ = {<~V>}:{<>} ^-> (<73>[^<wb>]*<pres>.*__)

%~V:0 <=> [ %+62: | %+63: | %+64: | %+65: ] ConsonantCluster %+present: _ ;
          %+73: ConsonantCluster %+present: _ ;

"Vowel Lengthening ~V:FrontVowels"

!! $vowellengthening6$ = {<~V>}:{y} ^-> ([y<^Y>] [^#vowels##ghostvowels#]* __)
!! $vowellengthening7$ = {<~V>}:{ä} ^-> ([ä<^AE>] [^#vowels##ghostvowels#]* __)
!! $vowellengthening8$ = {<~V>}:{ö} ^-> ([ö<^OE>] [^#vowels##ghostvowels#]* __)

%~V:Vf <=> Vf Vg: ConsonantCluster _ ; where Vf in FrontVowels
                                             Vg in FrontGhostVowels matched ;

"Vowel Lengthening ~V:NonFrontVowels"

!! $vowellengthening1$ = {<~V>}:{a} ^-> ([áàa<^A>] [^#vowels##ghostvowels#]* __)
!! $vowellengthening2$ = {<~V>}:{e} ^-> ([éèe<^E>] [^#vowels##ghostvowels#]* __)
!! $vowellengthening3$ = {<~V>}:{i} ^-> ([íïi<^I>] [^#vowels##ghostvowels#]* __)
!! $vowellengthening4$ = {<~V>}:{o} ^-> ([óòo<^O>] [^#vowels##ghostvowels#]* __)
!! $vowellengthening5$ = {<~V>}:{u} ^-> ([úùu<^U>] [^#vowels##ghostvowels#]* __)
!! $vowellengthening6$ = {<~V>}:{y} ^-> ([y<^Y>] [^#vowels##ghostvowels#]* __)
!! $vowellengthening7$ = {<~V>}:{ä} ^-> ([ä<^AE>] [^#vowels##ghostvowels#]* __)
!! $vowellengthening8$ = {<~V>}:{ö} ^-> ([ö<^OE>] [^#vowels##ghostvowels#]* __)

%~V:Vnf <=> [ Va | Vgr | Vnf | Vg: | Vh:Vnf ] ConsonantCluster  _ ; where Vnf in NonFrontVowels Va  in NonFrontAccentAcuteVowels Vgr in NonFrontAccentGraveVowels Vg  in NonFrontGhostVowels Vh  in VowelHarmonyMP matched ; 

"N-assimilation"

!!$n-assimilation1$ = {<~N>}:{l} ^-> (l [^#WordChars#]*__)
!!$n-assimilation2$ = {<~N>}:{r} ^-> (r [^#WordChars#]* __)
!!$n-assimilation3$ = {<~N>}:{s} ^-> (s [^#WordChars#]* __)
!!$n-assimilation0$ = \
!!	({<~N>}:{n} ^-> ([^rsl#gradations##ohitetmodes#]\
!!		[#gradations##ohitetmodes#]* __) )

%~N:Ns <=> Ns [ \?:WordChars ]* _ ; where Ns in ( l r s ) ;

"Comparative stem vowel variation A:e"

AÄ:e => _ [ \WordChars ]* %+comparative: ; where AÄ in ( a ä ) ;
